nb: Maksimal teppestørrelse som støttes: California King; Sprinkelseng; Full/dobbelt; King; Fang; Queen; Pledd; Twin; Twin XL; Annet
ko: 최대 이불 크기 지원: 캘리포니아 킹; 크립; 풀/더블; 킹; 랩; 퀸; 스로우; 트윈; 트윈 XL; 기타
pt-BR: Tamanho máximo de colcha suportado: California King; Berço; Casal; King; Colo; Queen; Manta; Solteiro; Solteiro XL; Outro
ro-RO: Dimensiunea maximă a pilotei suportate: California King; Pătuț de copil; Full/Dublu; King; Pentru genunchi; Queen; Pătură mică; Twin; Twin XL; Altele
ru: Максимальный поддерживаемый размер одеяла: California King; Детская кроватка; Двуспальный; King; Наколенный (Lap); Queen; Плед; Односпальный (Twin); Удлиненный односпальный (Twin XL); Другое
el: Μέγιστο υποστηριζόμενο μέγεθος παπλώματος: California King; Κούνιας; Διπλό; King; Ποδιών (Lap); Queen; Ριχτάρι; Μονό; Μονό XL; Άλλο
bg-BG: Максимален размер на одеяло (юрган), който се поддържа.: California King; Детско креватче; Двойно легло; Кинг; За скут; Куин; Малко одеяло; Единично легло; Единично легло XL; Друго
en: Maximum quilt size supported: California King; Crib; Full/Double; King; Lap; Queen; Throw; Twin; Twin XL; Other
de: Unterstützte maximale Quiltgröße: California King; Kinderbett; Full/Doppelbett; King; Schoßdecke; Queen; Überwurf; Twin; Twin XL; Sonstiges
vi: Kích thước chăn tối đa được hỗ trợ: California King; Cũi; Đôi; King; Cỡ đắp chân; Queen; Cỡ đắp ghế; Đơn; Đơn XL; Khác
sk-SK: Maximálna podporovaná veľkosť deky: California King; Detská postieľka; Full/Double; King; Na kolená; Queen; Prehoz; Twin; Twin XL; Iné
sl-SI: Največja podprta velikost prešite odeje: California King; Posteljica; Polna/dvojna postelja; King; Za v naročje; Queen; Odeja; Enojna postelja; Enojna postelja XL; Drugo
zh-CN: 支持的最大被子尺寸: 加州特大号; 婴儿床号; 全尺寸/双人号; 特大号; 盖腿毯; 大号; 搭毯; 单人号; 加长单人号; 其他
es: Tamaño máximo de acolchado compatible: California King; Cuna; Matrimonial/doble; King; Regazo; Queen; Manta; Individual; Individual XL; Otro
th: ขนาดผ้าห่มสูงสุดที่รองรับ: แคลิฟอร์เนียคิง; เด็กอ่อน; ฟูล/เตียงคู่; คิง; หน้าตัก; ควีน; สำหรับตกแต่ง; เตียงเดี่ยว; เตียงเดี่ยว XL; อื่นๆ
it: Dimensione massima del quilt supportata: California King; Culla; Letto a una piazza e mezza/Matrimoniale; Matrimoniale King; Da grembo; Matrimoniale Queen; Plaid; Singolo; Singolo XL; Altro
pt-PT: Tamanho máximo de colcha suportado: California King; Berço; Casal; King; De colo; Queen; Manta; Solteiro; Solteiro XL; Outro
hr-HR: Maksimalna podržana veličina prošivene deke: California King; Dječji krevetić; Full/Double; King; Za krilo; Queen; Prekrivač; Twin; Twin XL; Ostalo
tr: Desteklenen maksimum yorgan boyutu: California King; Bebek Karyolası; Çift Kişilik; King; Diz; Queen; Şal; Tek Kişilik; Tek Kişilik XL; Diğer
fi: Tilkkutäkin suurin tuettu koko: California King; Pinnasänky; Full/Double; King; Sylipeitto; Queen; Torkkupeitto; Twin; Twin XL; Muu
cs: Maximální podporovaná velikost prošívané deky: California King; Postýlka; Dvoulůžko; King; Přikrývka na nohy; Queen; Přehoz; Jednolůžko; Jednolůžko XL; Jiné
nl: Maximaal ondersteunde quiltmaat: California King; Wieg; Tweepersoons; King; Schoot; Queen; Plaid; Eenpersoons; Eenpersoons XL; Overige
zh-TW: 支援的最大拼布被尺寸: 加州特大雙人; 嬰兒床; 標準雙人床; 特大雙人; 膝毯; 加大雙人; 披毯; 單人; 特長單人; 其他
da: Maksimal understøttet quiltstørrelse: California king; Tremmeseng; Dobbeltseng; King; Skød; Queen; Plaid; Enkeltseng; Enkeltseng XL; Andet
hu: Legnagyobb támogatott quiltméret: California King; Kiságy; Full/Double; King; Öltakaró (lap); Queen; Dísztakaró (throw); Twin; Twin XL; Egyéb
sv: Maximal täckesstorlek som stöds: California King; Spjälsäng; Full/dubbel; King; Knätäcke; Queen; Pläd; Twin; Twin XL; Annat
ja: サポートされる最大キルトサイズ: カリフォルニアキング; ベビーベッド; フル/ダブル; キング; 膝掛け; クイーン; スロー; ツイン; ツインXL; その他
lt-LT: Maksimalus palaikomas antklodės dydis: „California King“; Vaikiškos lovelės; „Full“ / dvigulė; „King“; Antklodė ant kelių; „Queen“; Pledas; Viengulė; Viengulė XL; Kita
fr: Taille maximale de quilt prise en charge: California King; Lit de bébé; Double; King; Plaid; Queen; Jeté; Simple; Simple XL; Autre
pl: Maksymalny obsługiwany rozmiar kołdry: California King; Łóżeczko dziecięce; Podwójne; King; Lap; Queen; Narzuta; Twin; Twin XL; Inne